District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.66

Arrest records.

(a)

(1)

(A)

An individual may request production of his or her arrest record for the purposes of determining eligibility for sealing or expunging that record pursuant to Chapter 8 of Title 16 [§  16-801 et seq.], or similar sealing statutes in the District or in another jurisdiction, and may request production of his or her arrest record for filing a sealing or expungement motion.

(B)

The District may charge the individual a nominal fee for processing this request.

(C)

For the purposes of this subsection, an “arrest record” shall contain a listing of all adult arrests, regardless of the disposition of each arrest, and regardless of the date on which the arrest, conviction, or completion of the sentence occurred.

(2)

A person who requires an individual to produce any arrest record or any copy, extract, or statement thereof pursuant to this subsection other than for the purpose of filing a sealing or expungement motion shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 days.

(b)

(1)

(A)

An individual may request production of his or her arrest record or authorize another person to request production of his or her arrest record for any other purpose.

(B)

The District may charge the individual a nominal fee for processing this request.

(C)

For purposes of this subsection, an “arrest record” shall contain a listing only of adult convictions for which the sentence was completed not more than 10 years before the date on which the records were requested and forfeitures of collateral in a court proceeding that have occurred not more than 10 years before the date on which the record was requested; provided, that forfeitures of collateral in a court proceeding shall not include any forfeiture of collateral that was made pursuant to the post-and-forfeit procedure, as that term is defined in § 5-335.01(a).

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 266, 24 DCR 6038
June 15, 2013, D.C. Law 19-319, § 3, 60 DCR 2333
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-186, § 3, 61 DCR 12108
Apr. 24, 2015, D.C. Law 20-243, § 4, 61 DCR 8320
1981 Ed., § 1-2530.
1973 Ed., § 6-2276.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-319 rewrote the section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-186 redesignated (a)(1) through (3) as (a)(1)(A) through (a)(1)(C); and added (a)(2).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-243 added “provided, that forfeitures of collateral in a court proceeding shall not include any forfeiture of collateral that was made pursuant to the post-and-forfeit procedure, as that term is defined in § 5-335.01(a)” in (b)(1)(C).